Utah statutes.
57-8-4.   Status of the units.

Each unit, together with its undivided interest in the common areas and facilities, shall, for all purposes, constitute real property and may be individually conveyed, leased and encumbered and may be inherited or devised by will and be subject to all types of juridic acts inter vivos or mortis causa as if it were sole and entirely independent of all other units, and the separate units shall have the same incidents as real property, and the corresponding individual titles and interests therein shall be recordable.

